Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 299C.76, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply. (b) "Federal tax information" means federal tax returns and return information or information derived or created from federal tax returns, in possession of or control by the requesting agency, that is covered by the safeguarding provisions of section 6103(p)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code. (c) "IRS Publication 1075" means Internal Revenue Service Publication 1075 that provides guidance and requirements for the protection and confidentiality of federal tax information as required in section 6103(p)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code. (d) "National criminal history record information" means the Federal Bureau of Investigation identification records as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 28, section 20.3(d). (e) "Requesting agency" means the Department of Revenue; Department of Employment and Economic Development; Department of Human Services; Department of Children, Youth, and Families; board of directors of MNsure; Department of Information Technology Services; attorney general; new text begin Office of the Legislative Auditor; new text end and counties.